Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For note discussing grounds and proceedings for attachment, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For article surveying judicial developments in Georgia’s trial practice and procedure laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 249 (1979).

18-3-1.
Grounds for attachment.

Attachments may issue when the debtor:

Resides out of the state;

Moves or is about to move his domicile outside the limits of the county;

Absconds;

Conceals himself;

Resists legal arrest; or

Is causing his property to be removed beyond the limits of the state.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 69; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 1; Code 1863, § 3188; Code 1868, § 3199; Code 1873, § 3264; Code 1882, § 3264; Civil Code 1895, § 4510; Civil Code 1910, § 5055; Code 1933, § 8-101.

Law reviews.

For comment on Reeves v. Motor Contract Co., 324 F. Supp. 1011 (N.D. Ga. 1971), see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 369 (1972).

For note discussing notice and judicial supervision in postjudgment garnishment in Georgia, see 26 Emory L.J. 597 (1977).

18-3-2.
Right to seek attachment on money demands generally.

In all cases of money demands, whether arising ex contractu or ex delicto, the plaintiff shall have the right to seek attachment when the defendant places himself in such situation as will authorize a plaintiff to seek attachment.

History.

Ga. L. 1857, p. 23, § 1; Code 1863, § 3199; Code 1868, § 3210; Code 1873, § 3278; Code 1882, § 3278; Civil Code 1895, § 4524; Civil Code 1910, § 5069; Code 1933, § 8-102.

18-3-3.
Attachment prior to debt becoming due; stay of execution when debt not due before final judgment.

When the debt is not due, the debtor shall be subject to attachment in the same manner and to the same extent as in cases where the debt is due, except that, where the debt does not become due before final judgment, execution upon the judgment shall be stayed until the debt is due.

History.

Laws 1816, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 75; Code 1863, § 3197; Code 1868, § 3208; Code 1873, § 3275; Code 1882, § 3275; Civil Code 1895, § 4521; Civil Code 1910, § 5066; Code 1933, § 8-103.

18-3-4.
Attachment after action commenced; effect of judgment on pending action.

In all cases where the plaintiff has commenced an action for the recovery of a debt and the defendant, during the pendency of such action, shall become subject to attachment, the plaintiff may have an attachment against the defendant; and all the proceedings in relation to the same shall be as prescribed in relation to attachments where no action is pending. A satisfaction of the judgment in the common-law action shall satisfy the judgment in attachment, and a satisfaction of the judgment in attachment shall satisfy the judgment in the common-law action.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 28; Code 1863, § 3201; Code 1868, § 3212; Code 1873, § 3280; Code 1882, § 3280; Civil Code 1895, § 4526; Civil Code 1910, § 5071; Code 1933, § 8-104.

Law reviews.

For article discussing Sniadach v. Family Fin. Corp., 395 U.S. 337,

89 S. Ct. 1820

,

23 L. Ed. 2

d 349 (1969) in relation to former Georgia law on prejudgment garnishment, see 21 Mercer L. Rev. 495 (1970).

For article discussing Georgia’s long arm statute, prejudgment attachment and habeas corpus, with respect to judicial developments in practice and procedure in the fifth circuit, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 925 (1979).

18-3-5.
Attachment against administrator or executor; entry of final judgment.

Process of attachment may issue against an administrator of an estate or the executor of the last will and testament of any deceased person, as in other cases, when the administrator or executor actually removes or is about to remove the property of the deceased person outside the limits of any county, provided that final judgment shall not be entered against such administrator or executor until after the expiration of two years from the granting of letters of administration or letters testamentary, as the case may be.

History.

Ga. L. 1857, p. 24, § 1; Code 1863, § 3199; Code 1868, § 3210; Code 1873, § 3277; Code 1882, § 3277; Civil Code 1895, § 4523; Civil Code 1910, § 5068; Code 1933, § 8-105.

Cross references.

Administrators and personal representatives generally, T. 53, C. 6.

18-3-6.
Attachment against joint contractors or partners.

In cases of joint contractors and partners, where any one of them shall render himself liable to attachment according to law, an attachment may issue against him, upon the plaintiff, his agent, or his attorney at law complying with this article. The proceeding against such joint contractor or partner shall be in all respects as in other cases of attachment, except that such attachment shall be levied only upon the separate property of such joint contractor or partner.

History.

Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 19, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 26; Code 1863, § 3198; Code 1868, § 3209; Code 1873, § 3276; Code 1882, § 3276; Civil Code 1895, § 4522; Civil Code 1910, § 5067; Code 1933, § 8-106.

18-3-7.
Attachment against nonresident corporations.

Attachments may issue against nonresident corporations transacting business within the state under the same rules and regulations as are prescribed in relation to issuing attachments and garnishments in other cases.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 33; Code 1863, § 3202; Code 1868, § 3213; Code 1873, § 3281; Code 1882, § 3281; Civil Code 1895, § 4527; Civil Code 1910, § 5072; Code 1933, § 8-108.

18-3-8.
Right of surety or endorser upon an instrument of writing to attach property of principal.

In all cases where a person is surety or endorser upon an instrument of writing and the principal shall become subject to attachment according to Code Section 18-3-1, such surety or endorser may, upon complying with this chapter, have attachment against his principal. The proceedings shall be in all respects the same as in other cases of attachment, and the money raised by the attachment shall be paid to the person holding the instrument of writing.

If the surety or endorser has paid the debt, then the money raised upon the attachment or so much thereof as will pay the amount the surety or endorser has paid shall be paid to the surety or endorser.

In case the debt is not due at the time judgment is rendered against the principal, execution shall be stayed until the debt is due.

History.

Laws 1820, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 75; Laws 1842, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 88; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 27; Code 1863, § 3200; Code 1868, § 3211; Code 1873, § 3279; Code 1882, § 3279; Civil Code 1895, § 4525; Civil Code 1910, § 5070; Code 1933, § 8-107.

Cross references.

Suretyship generally, T. 10, C. 7.

18-3-9.
Application for issuance of writ of attachment prior to judgment; contents of application; procedure.

When the plaintiff contends one or more of the grounds set forth in Code Section 18-3-1 exist, prior to obtaining judgment against the defendant, the plaintiff may make application to a judge of any court of record, other than the probate court, in the county of the residence of the defendant, if known, and, if not known, in the county wherein the property sought to be attached is located, for an order authorizing issuance of a writ of attachment. The application shall be made in writing, under oath, and shall set forth the specific facts that show the existence of one or more of such grounds, the basis and nature of the claim, and the amount of indebtedness claimed therein by the plaintiff.

Upon presentation of plaintiff’s sworn application for a writ of attachment, it shall be the duty of the judge to inquire into the facts alleged, going beyond mere conclusions of fact alleged by the plaintiff and clearly setting forth the facts entitling the creditor to a writ of attachment as set forth in Code Section 18-3-1. Upon consideration of the inquiry, the judge shall have the discretion to grant or deny the issuance of a writ of attachment. Any order by a judge granting the issuance of a writ of attachment shall be subject to approval of a bond by the clerk of the court, pursuant to Code Section 18-3-10, prior to filing of the writ of attachment.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 2; Code 1863, § 3189; Code 1868, § 3200; Code 1873, § 3265; Code 1882, § 3265; Ga. L. 1893, p. 117, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4511; Civil Code 1910, § 5056; Code 1933, § 8-109; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1013, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 1.

18-3-10.
Bond requirements generally.

No writ of attachment shall issue unless accompanied by a bond with good security, conditioned to pay the defendant all costs and damages that he may sustain in consequence of the issuance of the writ of attachment in the event that the amount claimed to be due was not due, that no lawful ground for issuance of the attachment existed, or that the property sought to be attached was not subject to attachment. The bond shall be in a sum equal to twice the amount claimed due in the plaintiff’s application. The bond shall be presented to the clerk of the court where the application provided for in Code Section 18-3-9 is sought to be filed for approval by such clerk prior to filing of the writ of attachment.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 83; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 3; Code 1863, § 3190; Code 1868, § 3201; Code 1873, § 3266; Code 1882, § 3266; Ga. L. 1892, p. 56, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4512; Civil Code 1910, § 5057; Code 1933, § 8-111; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 2.

18-3-10.1.
Service of process in action against nonresident plaintiff for damages.

When a person who has been a defendant in attachment desires to bring an action against the plaintiff for damages, and the plaintiff in attachment does not reside in this state, it shall be sufficient to serve the complaint and summons on the security to the bond given by the plaintiff, and the action may proceed against both principal and security.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 54; Code 1863, § 3267; Code 1868, § 3278; Code 1873, § 3354; Code 1882, § 3354; Civil Code 1895, § 5013; Civil Code 1910, § 5595; Code 1933, § 3-304.

Cross references.

Service of process generally, §

9-11-4

.

18-3-11.
Affidavit for attachment and execution of bond when debt due to partnership or several persons jointly.

When the debt, for the recovery of which the attachment is sought, is due to a partnership or is due to several persons jointly, any one of the partners or joint creditors, his agent, or his attorney at law may make the affidavit and give the bond as prescribed and sign the names of the other partners or joint creditors to said bond; and the partners or joint creditors shall be bound thereby in the same manner as though they had signed it themselves.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 4; Code 1863, § 3191; Code 1868, § 3202; Code 1873, § 3267; Code 1882, § 3267; Civil Code 1895, § 4513; Civil Code 1910, § 5058; Code 1933, § 8-110.

18-3-12.
Persons who may be taken as security or surety on a bond.

No person shall be taken as security or surety on any attachment bond who is an attorney for the plaintiff or a nonresident, except such nonresident who is possessed of real estate in the county where the attachment issues which is the value of the amount of such bond.

History.

Ga. L. 1873, p. 29, § 1; Code 1873, § 3268; Code 1882, § 3268; Civil Code 1895, § 4514; Civil Code 1910, § 5059; Code 1933, § 8-112.

18-3-13.
Procedure for contesting sufficiency of bond; requirement of additional security or new bond; failure to comply.

When any attachment shall be issued and levied upon the property of the defendant, the defendant, his agent, or his attorney may file an affidavit stating that he has a good defense to the action, that the bond given in the action is not a good bond, and stating the ground of its insufficiency. When the affidavit is made and delivered to the levying officer, the officer shall return such attachment together with the affidavit forthwith to the judge issuing the attachment. The judge issuing the attachment shall without delay hear testimony as to the sufficiency of the bond and may in his discretion require additional security or a new bond to be given within such time as he may prescribe. If the plaintiff fails to provide such additional security or new bond, the judge shall dismiss the levy made under the attachment.

History.

Ga. L. 1873, p. 29, § 2; Code 1873, § 3271; Code 1882, § 3271; Ga. L. 1892, p. 56, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 4517; Ga. L. 1899, p. 37, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5062; Code 1933, § 8-113; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 3.

18-3-14.
Service of writ of attachment on defendant; notification of defendant of issuance of attachment.

The defendant shall be given notice of the attachment issued against his property by any one or more of the following methods:

The plaintiff, at the time the attachment is filed with the clerk, shall commence procedures to effectuate the service of a copy of the writ of attachment on the defendant; and service thereafter shall be made on the defendant as soon as is reasonably practicable. Service pursuant to this paragraph shall be made pursuant to Code Section 9-11-4;

The plaintiff, after issuance of the writ of attachment and not more than three business days after levy upon the property of the defendant, shall cause a written notice to be sent to the defendant at defendant’s last known address by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested. Either the return receipt indicating receipt by the defendant or the envelope bearing the official notification from the United States Postal Service of the defendant’s refusal to accept delivery or failure to claim such registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the attachment is pending. The defendant’s refusal to accept or failure to claim such registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to defendant shall be deemed notice to defendant;

The plaintiff, after the issuance of the writ of attachment and not more than three business days after levy upon the property of the defendant, shall cause a written notice to be delivered personally to the defendant by the plaintiff or by plaintiff’s attorney at law or other agent. A certification by the person making the delivery shall be filed with the clerk;

When the defendant resides out of the state or has departed the state or cannot, after due diligence, be found within the state or conceals his place of residence from the plaintiff and the fact shall appear, by affidavit, to the satisfaction of the judge or clerk of the court, the levy and attachment shall constitute sufficient notice to the defendant, provided such levy and attachment without more shall constitute sufficient notice, unless the plaintiff has actual knowledge of the defendant’s address, in which case, to provide sufficient notice, the plaintiff shall also mail a written notice of attachment to the defendant at said address or, not having actual knowledge of the defendant’s address but the address at which the defendant was last known to reside, to provide sufficient notice, the plaintiff shall also mail a written notice of attachment to the defendant at said address. A mailing of the written notice provided in this paragraph shall be made after the issuance of the writ of attachment and not more than three business days after levy upon the property of the defendant, and a certificate of such mailing shall be filed with the clerk by the person mailing the notice;

Where it shall appear by affidavit that a defendant in the attachment action is not a resident of this state or has departed from this state or, after due diligence, cannot be found in this state or that the defendant conceals his place of residence from the plaintiff, notice may be given by causing two publications of the written notice in the paper in which advertisements are printed by the sheriff in each county in which a writ of attachment is served. Such publications must be at least six days apart and the second publication must be made not more than 21 days after levy upon the property of the defendant. A certification by the person causing the notice to be published shall be filed with the clerk, provided such publication shall constitute sufficient notice alone, unless the plaintiff has actual knowledge of the defendant’s address, in which case, to provide sufficient notice, the plaintiff shall also mail a written notice of attachment to the defendant at said address. A mailing of the written notice provided in this paragraph shall be made after the issuance of the writ of attachment and not more than three business days after levy upon the property of the defendant, and a certificate of such mailing shall be filed with the clerk by the person mailing the notice; or

Where the defendant’s address is known, the plaintiff, after issuance of the attachment and not more than three business days after levy upon the property of the defendant, shall send a written notice of the attachment to the defendant at such known address by ordinary mail. A certification by the person mailing the notice shall be filed with the clerk.

The receiving by the defendant of actual timely notice of the attachment and levy shall constitute notice.

“Written notice,” as referred to in paragraphs (2) through (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall consist of a copy of the affidavit and bond for attachment or of a document which includes the names of the plaintiff and the defendant, the amount claimed in the affidavit for attachment, and the court wherein the proceeding is filed.

The methods of notification specified in subsection (a) of this Code section are cumulative and may be used in any sequence or combination. Where it appears that a plaintiff has reasonably, diligently, and in good faith attempted to use one method, another method thereafter may be utilized and, for the time during which the attempt was being made, the time limit shall be tolled for the subsequent method.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 70; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 5; Code 1863, § 3192; Code 1868, § 3203; Code 1873, § 3269; Code 1882, § 3269; Civil Code 1895, § 4515; Civil Code 1910, § 5060; Code 1933, § 8-114; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

18-3-15.
Right of defendant to postseizure hearing.

When a writ of attachment is issued against the property of the defendant, the defendant may at any time traverse the plaintiff’s affidavit upon which the attachment was obtained, stating that the affidavit is untrue or legally insufficient. Upon filing of the traverse, the court shall issue a show cause order to the plaintiff requiring him to appear at a specified time, which shall not be more than ten days from the filing of the traverse, to prove the grounds for the issuance of the attachment. If the plaintiff shall fail to carry the burden of proof, the order authorizing the attachment shall be revoked.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-114.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 5.

18-3-16.
Issuance and levy of attachment on Sunday.

Attachments may issue and be levied on Sunday when the plaintiff, his agent, or his attorney at law shall state, in his sworn application for a writ of attachment, that he has reason to believe the debt will not be satisfied unless process of attachment shall issue on Sunday and shall also comply with the other provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1834, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 482; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 23; Code 1863, § 3196; Code 1868, § 3207; Code 1873, § 3274; Code 1882, § 3274; Civil Code 1895, § 4520; Civil Code 1910, § 5065; Code 1933, § 8-115.

18-3-17.
Courts to which attachments returnable; applicability of rules of civil practice and procedure; filing of declaration in attachment; notice of declaration.

Attachments shall be returnable to the court of record in which filed pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 18-3-9 and shall be governed by the rules of procedure and practice governing ordinary civil actions, as respects appearance day, trial term, and judgment pursuant to default, and by any and all other rules relating to procedure and practice.

The plaintiff shall file his declaration in attachment within 15 days after the levy of attachment and the declaration shall thereafter be governed by the rules governing ordinary civil actions as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section. Notice of the declaration shall be given pursuant to Code Section 18-3-14.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 70, 638; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 6; Ga. L. 1857, p. 117, § 1; Code 1863, § 3194; Code 1868, § 3205; Code 1873, § 3272; Code 1882, § 3272; Civil Code 1895, § 4518; Civil Code 1910, § 5063; Code 1933, § 8-117; Ga. L. 1962, p. 520, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 6.

Cross references.

Provisions governing pleadings, defenses, and procedures subsequent to filing of declaration in attachment, §

18-3-18

.

Civil Practice Act, T. 9, C. 11.

18-3-18.
Applicability of Chapter 10 of Title 9 subsequent to filing of declaration in attachment.

All pleadings, defenses, and procedures subsequent to the filing of the declaration in attachment shall be governed by Chapter 10 of Title 9.

History.

Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 86; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 20; Code 1863, § 3221; Code 1868, § 3232; Code 1873, § 3308; Code 1882, § 3308; Civil Code 1895, § 4556; Civil Code 1910, § 5102; Code 1933, § 8-601; Ga. L. 1962, p. 520, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 12.

Law reviews.

For article surveying judicial developments in Georgia’s trial practice and procedure laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 249 (1979).

18-3-19.
Forms for attachment.

In all cases of attachment, the form of the affidavit, bond, attachment, and order authorizing the issuance thereof may be as follows:

Affidavit for attachment. AFFIDAVIT STATE OF GEORGIA COUNTY OF Personally appeared who on oath says that he is attorney at law for and that is indebted to said plaintiff in the sum of $ and that said defendant . Affiant Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , . Judge (2) Bond. BOND STATE OF GEORGIA COUNTY OF We, , principal, and , security, jointly and severally acknowledge ourselves bound unto the foregoing defendant in the sum of $ , subject to the following conditions: The said principal is seeking attachment against the said defendant which is now about to be sued out in the Court of County. Now, if the said plaintiff shall pay all damages that the defendant may sustain, and also all costs that may be incurred by him in consequence of suing out such attachment, in the event that the said plaintiff shall fail to recover in said case, then this bond shall be void. (SEAL) (SEAL) Witnessed and approved this day of , . Deputy Clerk, Court of County (3) Attachment. ATTACHMENT STATE OF GEORGIA COUNTY OF To the marshal of said court or his lawful deputies, to all and singular the sheriffs or their lawful deputies, and to all lawful constables of said state: You are commanded to seize so much of the property of the foregoing defendant as will make the sum of $ and all costs, and to serve such summons of garnishment as may be placed in your hands, and that you make return of this attachment with your actions entered thereon to the term, , of the Court of County, to which court this attachment is hereby made returnable. This day of , . (SEAL) Court of County (4) Order. IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff ) v. ) Civil action ) ) File no. Defendant ) ) ORDER Upon application of the plaintiff for a writ of attachment, and having considered the affidavit with bond attached, and inquiring into the grounds and circumstances herein, it is the determination of this court that the plaintiff is (or is not) entitled to a writ of attachment, and it is ORDERED that a writ of attachment issue upon the property of the defendant (or that a writ of attachment be denied). This day of , . Judge, Court of County

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 42; Code 1863, § 3205; Code 1868, § 3216; Code 1873, § 3283; Code 1882, § 3283; Civil Code 1895, § 4529; Civil Code 1910, § 5074; Code 1933, § 8-119; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 18.

18-3-20.
Substantial compliance in matters of form sufficient.

A substantial compliance in all matters of form shall be held sufficient in all applications for attachment and in all attachments issued as provided by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 43; Code 1863, § 3204; Code 1868, § 3215; Code 1873, § 3282; Code 1882, § 3282; Civil Code 1895, § 4528; Civil Code 1910, § 5073; Code 1933, § 8-118.